Utah statutes.
19-6-715.   Recycling fee collection procedures.
(1)  The lubricating oil vendor shall pay the fee collected under Section
19-6-714 to the commission on or before the last day of the month following
the calendar quarter in which the sale occurs.
(2)  The lubricating oil vendor may retain a maximum of 2% of the recycling
fee it collects under Section 19-6-714 for the costs of collecting the fee.
(3)  The payment of the fee to the commission shall be accompanied by a form
provided by the commission.
